Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
Officers and Employees

21.150.
Commissioners of Court of Appeals. [Repealed.]

21.151.
Compensation of retired commissioners of Court of Appeals. [Repealed.]

21.155.
Law clerks for court. [Repealed.]

21.160.
Clerical assistants for judges and commissioners. [Repealed.]

21.170.
Clerk’s salary. [Repealed.]

21.180.
Salaries of deputies of clerk fixed by court. [Repealed.]

21.190.
Assistance clerk of Court of Appeals. [Repealed.]

21.200.
Notice to special judges of hearing. [Repealed.]

21.210.
Inspection of clerk’s office by court. [Repealed.]

21.220.
Administrative director. [Repealed.]

21.230.
Process, to whom directed. [Repealed.]

21.240.
Court reporter and his clerk — Appointment and compensation. [Repealed.]

21.250.
Duties of reporter. [Repealed.]

21.260.
Publication of opinions of Court of Appeals — No copyright. [Repealed.]

21.270.
Number of copies; distribution. [Repealed.]

21.280.
No copyright; preservation of pages or forms. [Repealed.]

21.290.
Reprinting of reports. [Repealed.]

21.300.
Advance sheets, publication. [Repealed.]

21.305.
Circuit judges to be special commissioners of Court of Appeals — Duties — Compensation — Removal. [Repealed.]

21.310.
Advance sheets, subscriptions. [Repealed.]

21.320.
Certification of cost of publication. [Repealed.]